Utah statutes.
59-11-107.   Delinquencies -- Interest -- Penalty.
(1)  Any tax due under this chapter which is not paid by the time prescribed
for the filing of the return as provided under Subsection 59-11-105 (1), not
including any extensions in respect to the filing of the return or the payment
of the tax, shall bear interest at the rate and in the manner prescribed in
Section 59-1-402.
(2)  If the return provided for in Section 59-11-105 is not filed within the
specified time periods, the personal representative shall pay, in addition to
the interest provided in Subsection (1), a penalty as provided in Section
59-1-401 in respect to the transfer for each month beyond the time periods
that the return has not been filed.
